Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,118
Relevant, defined.

Relevant shall mean information having any tendency to make the existence of any fact that is of consequence to the investigation or determination of the issue more probable or less probable than it would be without the evidence.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 4.